Georgia, session 2025_26, HB915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to law enforcement officers and
agencies, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 915
- 1 -

LC 56 0398
"35-1-24.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'civilian community responder' means a
nonsworn law enforcement employee who:
(1) Assists in the investigation of traffic accidents;
(2) Assists in the investigation of property crimes;
(3) Assists in educating the public about state laws and local ordinances; and
(4) Assists in the search for missing persons.
(b) A county or municipal law enforcement agency of this state shall be authorized to
employ, designate, equip, and train civilian community responders.
(c) No county or municipal law enforcement agency shall employ civilian community
responders for purposes of reducing or replacing sworn law enforcement officers.
(d) No civilian community responder shall exercise any of the powers or authority which
are by law vested in the office of sheriff or any other peace officer, including the power of
arrest, except as may be authorized by law. No civilian community responder shall:
(1) Have the power to possess and carry firearms and other weapons for the purpose of
investigating motor vehicle traffic accidents; provided, however, that any individual who
is a lawful weapons carrier as such term is defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1 shall not
be in violation of this paragraph; or
(2) Be issued a weapon of any type by the county or municipal law enforcement agency.
(e) A county or municipal law enforcement agency that employs civilian community
responders shall establish the minimum standards for employment.
(f) Each civilian community responder shall attend and complete a uniform training
program established by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council. Such
program shall at a minimum consist of four hours of instruction and include education on
motor vehicle accident and property crime investigations. Upon completion of such
program, each civilian community responder shall spend not less than four weeks of field
H. B. 915
- 2 -

LC 56 0398
training with a law enforcement officer who has experience conducting traffic accident and
property crime investigations.
(g) A civilian community responder shall be issued the following by a county or municipal
law enforcement agency:
(1) Credentials identifying the individual as such and which shall be produced upon
request by an individual involved in or a witness to a motor vehicle traffic accident; and
(2) A uniform that is substantially different in color and style from any law enforcement
officer in this state and which displays the name of the civilian community responder and
patches that identify the individual as a civilian community responder. Such uniform
shall remain the property of the law enforcement agency that employs the civilian
community responder.
(h) No civilian community responder employed pursuant to the authority of this Code
section shall be issued a badge as defined in Code Section 35-10-3.
(i) No vehicle issued to, or used by, a civilian community responder shall bear markings
or symbols that identify the vehicle as a law enforcement vehicle. Such vehicle may have
emergency equipment and lights installed; provided, however, that no such vehicle shall
be equipped with flashing, blinking, revolving, or stationary blue lights.
(j) A civilian community responder who investigates a motor vehicle accident shall
instruct the driver of each motor vehicle in an accident to report the following to all other
parties suffering property damage as an apparent result of the accident:
(1) The name and address of the operator of the motor vehicle and the name and address
of the registered owner of the motor vehicle if the operator of the motor vehicle is not the
owner;
(2) The license number of the motor vehicle; and
(3) The name of the liability insurance carrier for the motor vehicle or the fact that such
operator has a certificate of self-insurance issued pursuant to Code Section 33-34-5.1.
H. B. 915
- 3 -

LC 56 0398
(k) A civilian community responder shall use uniform accident reports and procedures set
forth in Code Section 40-6-278 and shall have the same authority as a law enforcement
officer to direct, control, or regulate traffic for the express purpose of towing or removing
a vehicle that is obstructing a highway.
(l) A civilian community responder who assists in the investigation of a property crime
shall be limited to taking statements and producing an initial police report in such
investigation.
(m) It shall be unlawful for any individual to willfully obstruct, resist, impede, or interfere
with a civilian community responder employed pursuant to this Code section in connection
with such individual's investigation or to retaliate or discriminate in any manner against
such individual as a reprisal for any act or omission of such individual. Any violation of
this subsection shall be punishable as a misdemeanor."
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 35-8-7, relating to powers and duties
of the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, as follows:
"35-8-7.
The council is vested with the following powers and duties:
(1) To meet at such times and places as it may deem necessary;
(2) To contract with other agencies, public or private, or persons as it deems necessary
for the rendering and affording of such services, facilities, studies, and reports to the
council as will best assist it to carry out its duties and responsibilities;
(3) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of every department, agency, or
instrumentality in the state government or its political subdivisions in the furtherance of
the purposes of this chapter;
(4) To establish criteria to be used in certifying schools authorized to conduct training
required by this chapter;
H. B. 915
- 4 -

LC 56 0398
(5) To certify schools as authorized to conduct training required by this chapter;
(6) To prescribe minimum qualifications for directors of schools certified to conduct
training required by this chapter;
(7) To certify such school directors;
(8) To establish minimum qualifications for instructors at schools certified to conduct
training required by this chapter;
(9) To certify instructors authorized to conduct training required by this chapter;
100 (10) To reevaluate certified schools annually to determine if such schools shall continue
101 to be certified;
102 (11) To withdraw or suspend certification of schools, school directors, and instructors
103 who fail to continue to meet or maintain, at any given time, the criteria and qualifications
104 required for school, school director, or instructor certification;
105 (12) To determine whether a candidate has met the requirements of this chapter and is
106 qualified to be employed as a peace officer and to issue a certificate to those so qualified;
107 (13) To certify to designated law enforcement units a candidate's successful completion
108 of the course;
109 (14) To refuse to grant a certificate to or to discipline a certified peace officer or an
110 exempt peace officer under this chapter or any antecedent law;
111 (15) To establish and modify the curriculum, including the methods of instruction,
112 composing the basic training courses and to set the minimum number of hours therefor;
113 (15.1) To establish a uniform training program for civilian community responders which
114 shall be made available to civilian community responders employed by a county or
115 municipality pursuant to Code Section 35-1-24;
116 (16) To establish and recommend curricula for such advanced, in-service, and
117 specialized training courses as the council shall deem advisable and to recognize the
118 completion of such courses by the issuance of certificates;
119 (17) To provide technical assistance as requested by law enforcement units;
H. B. 915
- 5 -

LC 56 0398
120 (18) To provide for and administer the registration of all exempt peace officers;
121 (19) To research, plan, and establish policy relative to peace officer training and to
122 develop and coordinate the delivery of peace officer training programs through such
123 agencies and institutions as the council may deem appropriate;
124 (20) To establish as part of the curriculum for basic and in-service training courses for
125 all peace officers training on organized criminal activity and criminal street gangs;
126 (21) To develop, adopt, and issue advanced or professional peace officer certificates
127 based upon the attainment of specified education, advanced or specialized training, and
128 experience as the council may determine;
129 (22) To provide and administer the certification of persons qualified to operate radar
130 speed detection devices and to withdraw or suspend such certificates as provided for in
131 this chapter;
132 (23) To impose administrative fees, as determined by the council, for services provided
133 pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
134 (24) To adopt in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative
135 Procedure Act,' such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of
136 this chapter; and
137 (25) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it to perform wholly and
138 adequately its duties and to exercise the power granted to it."
139 SECTION 3.
140 Chapter 6 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to uniform rules
141 of the road, is amended by revising Code Section 40-6-2, relating to obedience to authorized
142 persons directing traffic, as follows:
143 "40-6-2.
144 No person shall fail or refuse to comply with any lawful order or direction of any law
145 enforcement officer or firefighter, nonsworn employee or volunteer authorized under Code
H. B. 915
- 6 -

LC 56 0398
146 Section 35-1-11, or individual designated under Code Section 20-2-1131, or civilian
147 community responder employed pursuant to Code Section 35-1-24 with the authority to
148 direct, control, or regulate traffic."
149 SECTION 4.
150 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 40-6-278, relating to uniform
151 motor vehicle accident reports and reporting procedures, as follows:
152 "40-6-278.
153 The commissioner of transportation shall prescribe, by rule, uniform motor vehicle accident
154 reports and reporting procedures which shall be used by all police officers, whether state,
155 county, or municipal, and by all civilian community responders, whether county or
156 municipal. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the
157 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.' The rules may require one type of report and
158 reporting procedure for motor vehicle accidents in which property damage alone is
159 involved and another type of report and reporting procedure for motor vehicle accidents
160 involving personal injury or death. The commissioner may, by rule, require additional
161 investigation or reports in case of serious bodily injury or death."
162 SECTION 5.
163 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 915
- 7 -